tests/bom.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY анісырлеокятдувзмпцўбгґчьшхйэжюёАНПЯІСКТВМДЗГҐУЛБфШЁХРЧЦЮЖОФЎЭЕЫЙЬ
FULLSTRIP
NEEDAFFIX z
PFX A N 2
PFX A лыжка сьвіньня лыжка
PFX A лыж шчот лыж
SFX B N 1
SFX B екар ыжка лекар
SFX C N 1
SFX C ка 0/ABz ка
PFX X N 2
PFX X аая бю ааяр
PFX X ааа ба ааа
SFX Y N 1
SFX Y ааа яв/Z ааа
SFX Z N 1
SFX Z в ргер в
